Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-108
Judgment on conviction.

If the accused person be found guilty, judgment of removal from office, or disqualifying such person from holding or enjoying any office of honor, profit, or trust in the state, or both, may be rendered as in other cases.

Laws 1879, § 8, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1135;

C.S.1922, § 1064;

C.S.1929, § 27-108;

R.S.1943, § 24-108.

Power of impeachment cannot be exercised after person has gone out of office. State v. Leese, 37 Neb. 92, 55 N.W. 798 (1893); State v. Hill, 37 Neb. 80, 55 N.W. 794 (1893).